Maryland, session 2026, HB0335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–134.
(A) A PRIVATE ROAD SHALL BE CONSIDERED OFFERED FOR DEDICATION TO
PUBLIC USE IF THE ROAD HAS BEEN OPEN TO PUBLIC TRAVEL FOR 20 YEARS OR
MORE.
(B) AN OFFER FOR THE DEDICATION OF A PRIVATE ROAD TO PUBLIC USE
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSIDERED ACCEPTED BY THE
STATE, A COUNTY, OR A MUNICIPALITY IF THE STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY
PROVIDES MAINTENANCE OF AND REPAIR TO THE PRIVATE ROAD IN THE SAME
MANNER AS A PUBLIC ROAD BEFORE OR FOLLOWING THE OFFER.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0335*

HOUSE BILL 335
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ENACT
OR ENFORCE A LOCAL LAW, ORDINANCE, OR REGULATION THAT CONFLICTS WITH
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
(D) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED AS
LIMITING OR PROHIBITING ANY ALTERNATIVE METHOD OF OFFER OR ACCEPTANCE
OF DEDICATION OF PRIVATE LAND TO PUBLIC USE AVAILABLE UNDER LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.